Tennessee statutes. Title 42 Aeronautics
Part 1

General Regulations

42-1-101. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Aeronaut” includes aviator, pilot, balloonist, and every other person having any part in the operation of aircraft while in flight;

“Aircraft” includes balloon, airplane, hydroplane, and every other vehicle used for navigation through the air. A hydroplane, while at rest on water and while being operated on or immediately above water, shall be governed by the rules regarding water navigation; while being operated through the air otherwise than immediately above water, it shall be treated as an aircraft;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of transportation;

“Department” means the department of transportation; and

“Passenger” includes any person riding in an aircraft but having no part in its operation.

Acts 1923, ch. 30, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1616a12; Code 1932, § 2716; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-101; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 17.

Cross-References. Aerial application of pesticides, title 43, ch. 8, part 3.

Aircraft piracy, first degree murder, §39-13-202.

Airport and aircraft security, §39-17-109.

Aviation fuel, §67-6-217.

Aviation fuel, title 67, ch. 4, part 27.

Classification and Assessment if utilities and carriers, title 67, ch. 5, part 13.

Confiscation of aircraft in drug control, title 53, ch. 11, part 2.

Conveyances subject to forfeiture, §40-33-101.

Disorderly conduct, title 39, ch. 17, part 3.

Exemption of aviation fuel from taxation, §67-3-409.

Exemptions from sales and use tax, title 67, ch. 6, part 3.

Goods subject to forfeiture and seizure in drug control, §53-11-451.

Liens against aircraft, title 66, ch. 19, part 3.

Military property, title 58, ch. 1, part 5.

Procedure for seizing contraband alcoholic beverages, §57-9-202.

Procedure for seizing contraband tobacco, §67-4-1021.

Standards for vehicles and equipment, §68-140-307.

State aviation hall of fame, §4-1-326.

Transportation equity fund, commissioners' annual report, §67-6-408.

Transportation equity trust fund, §9-4-207.

Vehicles subject to confiscation transporting alcoholic beverages, §57-9-201.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Airplanes and Airports, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Trespass — Airplanes at Low Altitudes, 8 Tenn. L. Rev. 285.

Comparative Legislation. Regulation of aircraft generally:

Ala. Code §23-1-350 et seq.

Ark. Code §23-14-101 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. §6-1-1 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 183.010 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. §61-1-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 305.010 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 63-11 et seq.

Va. Code § 5.1-1 et seq.

42-1-102. Sovereignty in space above lands and waters.

Sovereignty in the space above the lands and waters of this state is declared to rest in the state, except where granted to and assumed by the United States pursuant to a constitutional grant from the people of this state.

Acts 1923, ch. 30, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 1616a13; Code 1932, § 2717; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-102.

42-1-103. Ownership in space above lands and waters is in surface owners beneath.

The ownership of the space above the lands and waters of this state is declared to be vested in the several owners of the surface beneath, subject to the right of flight described in §42-1-104.

Acts 1923, ch. 30, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1616a14; Code 1932, § 2718; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-103.

Collateral References.

Air navigation as invasion of property rights of owner of surface. 69 A.L.R. 317.

42-1-104. Air flights lawful — Exceptions — Forced landing — Liability for damages.

Flight in aircraft over the lands and waters of this state is lawful unless at such a low altitude as to interfere with the existing use to which the land or water, or the space over the land or water, is put by the owner, or unless so conducted as to be imminently dangerous to persons or property lawfully on the land or water beneath.

The landing of an aircraft on the lands or waters of another person, without that person's consent, is unlawful, except in the case of a forced landing. For damages caused by a forced landing, however, the owner or lessee of the aircraft or the aeronaut shall be liable, as provided in § 42-1-105.

Acts 1923, ch. 30, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 1616a15; Code 1932, § 2719; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-104.

42-1-105. Liability of owner, pilot or lessee of aircraft for damages — Prima facie ownership.

As used in this section, “owner” includes a person having full title to the aircraft or operating it through servants, and also includes a bona fide lessee or bailee of the aircraft, whether gratuitously or for hire. “Owner” does not include a bona fide bailor or lessor of the aircraft, whether gratuitously or for hire, or a mortgagee, conditional seller, trustee for creditors of the aircraft or other person having a security title only, nor shall the owner of the aircraft be liable when the pilot thereof is in possession thereof as a result of theft or felonious conversion.

The owner and pilot, or either of them, of every aircraft that is operated over lands or waters of this state shall be liable for injuries or damage to persons or property on the land or water beneath, caused by the ascent, descent, or flight of the aircraft, or the dropping or falling of any objects therefrom in accordance with the rules of law applicable to torts in this state.

The person in whose name an aircraft is registered with the United States department of commerce or the Tennessee department of transportation shall be prima facie the owner of the aircraft within the meaning of this section.

Acts 1923, ch. 30, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 1616a16; Code 1932, § 2720; Acts 1957, ch. 325, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 16; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-105.

Law Reviews.

Federal Tort Claims Act — Conflict of Absolute Liability with Limited Waiver of Immunity. 40 Tenn. L. Rev. 767.

42-1-106. Rules of law of jurisdiction determining liability of owners.

The liability of the owner of one (1) aircraft to the owner of another aircraft, or to aeronauts or passengers on either aircraft, for damages caused by collision on land or in the air, shall be determined by the rules of law applicable to torts on land.

Acts 1923, ch. 30, § 6; Shan. Supp., § 1616a17; Code 1932, § 2721; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-106.

Collateral References.

Choice of law consideration in application of aviation guest statutes. 62 A.L.R.3d 1076.

42-1-107. Laws of this state govern as to wrongs and damages.

All crimes, torts, and other wrongs committed by or against an aeronaut or passenger while in flight over this state shall be governed by the laws of this state; and the question whether damage occasioned by or to an aircraft while in flight over this state constitutes a tort, crime, or other wrong by or against the owner of the aircraft shall be determined by the laws of this state.

Acts 1923, ch. 30, § 7; Shan. Supp., § 1616a18; Code 1932, § 2722; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-107.

Cross-References. Aggravated assault, §39-13-102.

Arson; setting fire to personal property, §§39-14-301,39-14-303.

Vandalism, §39-14-408.

Collateral References.

Choice of law consideration in application of aviation guest statutes. 62 A.L.R.3d 1076.

Liability of owner of wires, poles, or structures struck by aircraft for resulting injury or damage. 49 A.L.R.5th 659.

42-1-108. Contracts and other relations made while in flight.

All contractual and other legal relations entered into by aeronauts or passengers while in flight over this state shall have the same effect as if entered into on the land or water beneath.

Acts 1923, ch. 30, § 8; Shan. Supp., § 1616a19; Code 1932, § 2723; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-108.

42-1-109. Dropping objects in flight — Penalty.

Any aeronaut or passenger who, while in flight over a thickly inhabited area or over a public gathering within this state, drops any object except loose water or loose sand ballast, commits a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1923, ch. 30, § 9; Shan. Supp., § 1616a20; Code 1932, § 2724; impl. am. Acts 1947, ch. 132; C. Supp. 1950, § 2724; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-109; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 112.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

42-1-110. Intentionally killing or attempting to kill birds or animals — Penalty.

Any aeronaut or passenger who, while in flight within this state, intentionally kills or attempts to kill any birds or animals commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1923, ch. 30, § 10; Shan. Supp., § 1616a21; Code 1932, § 2725; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-110; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Hunting from aircraft, water craft, or motor vehicles unlawful, §70-4-109.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Tennessee Farm Animal and Research Facilities Protection Act, title 39, ch. 14, part 8.

42-1-111. Damaging or extinguishing beacons — Penalty.

It is unlawful for any person or persons to willfully damage, deface or extinguish any beacon, marker, guide light, directional sign, or landing area lights provided or erected in this state for the guidance of aircraft.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1947, ch. 133, §§ 1, 2; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 2726.8, 2726.9 (Williams, §§ 2726.70, 2726.71); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-119; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

42-1-112. Uniformity of state laws — Harmony with federal requirements.

This part shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states that enact them, and to harmonize, as far as possible, with federal laws and regulations on the subject of aeronautics.

Acts 1923, ch. 30, § 11; Shan. Supp., § 1616a22; Code 1932, § 2726; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 42-111.

42-1-113. Aircraft sales and purchases — Reports.

Any person who sells an aircraft in this state, any person who purchases an aircraft in this state, and every resident of this state who purchases an aircraft shall report to the commissioner of revenue the following information:

The name, sales tax registration number, and invoice number of the seller;

The name and address of the purchaser;

A description of the aircraft;

The date of sale;

The place and date of delivery;

The name of the seller, or the seller's agent, making delivery to a point outside this state;

The place the aircraft will be based;

The trade-in allowance, if any, and the total sales price; and

A statement whether Tennessee sales or use tax has been paid.

In the case of a sale in which the seller, or the seller's agent, actually makes delivery of the aircraft to a point outside this state, and in the case of a sale where the aircraft will be removed within thirty (30) calendar days of purchase to another state for use outside this state, the seller and the purchaser shall execute at the time of sale an affidavit stating that neither party has knowledge or reason to believe that the aircraft will be used in or brought back into the state of Tennessee. This affidavit shall be filed with the commissioner of revenue.

Any seller of an aircraft, or the seller's agent, making delivery of an aircraft to a point outside this state shall execute an affidavit within thirty (30) days of delivery, stating the date and place of delivery, the name and address of the person to whom delivery was made and the name and type of business the purchaser is involved in and a brief statement of purpose regarding the planned use of the aircraft. This affidavit shall be filed with the commissioner of revenue.

If the purchaser is a resident of this state, the commissioner of revenue shall send a copy of the information required in subsection (a) to the assessor of property of the county in which the purchaser resides.

Acts 1984, ch. 846, § 1.